Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.15.067

Tuition fees—Established.

(1) Tuition fees shall be established under the provisions of this chapter.

(2) The maximum increase in tuition operating fees for resident undergraduates at institutions of higher education as defined in RCW 28B.10.016, excluding applied baccalaureate degrees as defined in RCW 28B.50.030, shall be calculated by the office of financial management and transmitted to the institutions of higher education by October 1st of each year for the following academic year. Tuition operating fees for resident undergraduates at institutions of higher education as defined in RCW 28B.10.016, excluding applied baccalaureate degrees as defined in RCW 28B.50.030, may increase by no more than the average annual percentage growth rate in the median hourly wage for Washington as the wage is determined by the federal bureau of labor statistics and calculated based on the previous 14 years prior to the transmittal date by the office of financial management.

(3) The governing boards of the state universities, regional universities, and The Evergreen State College; and the state board for community and technical colleges may reduce or increase full-time tuition fees for all students other than resident undergraduates, including nonresident students, summer school students, and students in other self-supporting degree programs. Percentage increases in full-time tuition may exceed the fiscal growth factor. Except during the 2013-2015 fiscal biennium, the state board for community and technical colleges may pilot or institute differential tuition models. The board may define scale, scope, and rationale for the models.

(4) The tuition fees established under this chapter shall not apply to high school students enrolling in participating institutions of higher education under RCW 28A.600.300 through 28A.600.400.

(5)(a) The tuition fees established under this chapter shall not apply to eligible students enrolling in a dropout reengagement program through an interlocal agreement between a school district and a community or technical college under RCW 28A.175.100 through 28A.175.110.

(b) The tuition fees established under this chapter shall not apply to students incarcerated with the department of corrections who are participating in credit-eligible postsecondary education courses and degree programs when the program expenses are funded by nontuition resources such as, but not limited to, grants, contracts, and donations.

(6) As a result of any changes in tuition under section 3, chapter 36, Laws of 2015 3rd sp. sess., the governing boards of the state universities, the regional universities, and The Evergreen State College shall not reduce resident undergraduate enrollment below the 2014-15 academic year levels.

[ 2023 c 9 s 1; 2021 c 200 s 9; 2020 c 114 s 4; 2015 3rd sp.s. c 36 s 3; 2015 c 55 s 211; 2013 2nd sp.s. c 4 s 958. Prior: 2012 2nd sp.s. c 7 s 914; 2012 c 228 s 6; 2011 1st sp.s. c 10 s 3; 2010 c 20 s 7; 2009 c 574 s 1; 2007 c 355 s 7; 2006 c 161 s 6; 2003 c 232 s 4; 1997 c 403 s 1; 1996 c 212 s 1; 1995 1st sp.s. c 9 s 4; 1992 c 231 s 4; 1990 1st ex.s. c 9 s 413; 1986 c 42 s 1; 1985 c 390 s 15; 1982 1st ex.s. c 37 s 15; 1981 c 257 s 2.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2020 c 114: See note following RCW 28A.175.075.

Short title—2015 3rd sp.s. c 36: See note following RCW 28B.15.031.

Effective dates—2013 2nd sp.s. c 4: See note following RCW 2.68.020.

Effective date—2012 2nd sp.s. c 7: See note following RCW 2.68.020.

Findings—Intent—Short title—2011 1st sp.s. c 10: See notes following RCW 28B.15.031.

Intent—2010 c 20: See note following RCW 28A.175.100.

Finding—Intent—2007 c 355: See note following RCW 28B.50.535.

Effective date—2006 c 161: See note following RCW 49.04.160.

Finding—Intent—2003 c 232: See note following RCW 28B.15.031.

Severability—1996 c 212: "If any provision of this act or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other persons or circumstances is not affected." [ 1996 c 212 s 2.]

Intent—Purpose—Effective date—1995 1st sp.s. c 9: See notes following RCW 28B.15.031.

Effective date—1992 c 231: See note following RCW 28B.10.016.

Finding—Severability—1990 1st ex.s. c 9: See notes following RCW 28A.225.220.

Effective date—Severability—1982 1st ex.s. c 37: See notes following RCW 28B.15.012.

Severability—1981 c 257: See note following RCW 28B.15.031.